District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Lighting Intentionally Guides and Halts Transgressions in DC (LIGHT
DC) Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective May 21,
2002 (D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 5(a)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.04) is amended by adding a new
subparagraph (M-i) to read as follows:
“(M-i) Install and maintain high quality lighting in all designated pedestrian


crosswalks and bicycle trails in parks and forested areas, which shall be illuminated from dusk to
dawn;”
(b) Section 9(c) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.20(c)), is amended by striking the phrase
“transportation, including education” and inserting the phrase “transportation, including adding
lighting to all pedestrian crosswalks and bicycle trails in parks and forested areas, education” in
its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(l)).